Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 9. Legal Representation.

§ 63.2-1947.
Assistance by Office of the Attorney General.

The attorney for the Commonwealth or other attorney who has responsibility for representing a local department and local board may, with the prior consent of the Attorney General, obtain the assistance of the Office of the Attorney General in the conduct of litigation arising under this chapter.

History.

1988, c. 906, § 63.1-274.8; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1948.
Payment by Department for legal services.

Notwithstanding any provision of §§

2.2-2814

,

2.2-2815

,

2.2-2816

,

2.2-2823

,

2.2-2824

,

2.2-2825

or §

2.2-2826

to the contrary, whenever there shall be authorized by law an attorney for the Commonwealth, the Department may contract with the county or city or combination thereof for whom such attorney for the Commonwealth is authorized regarding the payment by the Department of the salary, expenses, including secretarial services, and allowances or part thereof of such attorney, as shall be approved by the Compensation Board, for the entire time devoted to these duties. Any such contract may provide that the county, city or combination thereof shall pay such salary, expenses and allowances and that the Department shall reimburse such county or city therefor. The amount of such salary, expenses and allowances shall be set by the Compensation Board as provided by law.

Whenever there is in any county or city a county attorney or city attorney whose duties consist of legal services with respect to the provisions of this chapter, the Department may contract with such county or city regarding the duties of such county or city attorney and regarding payment by the Department of the salary, expenses, including secretarial services, and allowances or part thereof of such attorney for the time devoted to these duties. Any such contract may provide that the county or city shall pay such salary, expenses and allowances and that the Department shall reimburse such county or city therefor.

History.

1988, c. 906, § 63.1-274.9; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1949.
Authority of city, county, or attorney for the Commonwealth to represent the Department.

In order to carry out the responsibilities of the Department imposed under this chapter, any city or county attorney is authorized to represent the Department in any civil proceeding necessary for the establishment, modification, enforcement, or collection of support obligations and any attorney for the Commonwealth is authorized to represent the Department in any civil or criminal proceeding necessary for the establishment, modification, enforcement, or collection of support obligations.

History.

1988, c. 906, § 63.1-274.4; 1990, c. 85; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1950.
Child support enforcement privatized legal services.

The Attorney General shall provide and supervise legal services to the Division of Child Support Enforcement in child support enforcement cases to establish, obligate, enforce and collect child support. In addition to other methods of providing legal services as may be authorized by law, the Attorney General may contract with private attorneys to provide such services as special counsel pursuant to §

2.2-510

or to conduct programs to evaluate the costs and benefits of the privatization of such legal services. The compensation for such special and private counsel shall be paid out of funds received by the Division of Child Support Enforcement as provided by state and federal law and such reasonable attorney’s fees as may be recovered. The Attorney General may also use collection agencies as may be necessary and cost-effective to pursue fully the recovery of all costs and fees authorized by §

63.2-1960

in proceedings to enforce child support obligations.

History.

1996, c. 1054, § 63.1-249.1; 1998, cc. 494, 499; 2002, cc. 262, 747.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 262 amended § 63.1-249.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 262 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2002 amendment by c. 262 deleted subsection B, which formerly read: “By July 1 of each year, the Department shall submit a written report to the Governor and General Assembly with a detailed summary and evaluation of the privatization of child support enforcement programs.”